Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.008

Duties of employing agencies.

(1) Every employing agency shall carry out all actions required by the authority under this chapter including, but not limited to, those necessary for the operation of benefit plans, education of employees, claims administration, and appeals process.

(2) Employing agencies shall report all data relating to employees eligible to participate in benefits or plans administered by the authority in a format designed and communicated by the authority.

[ 2009 c 537 s 1; 2005 c 143 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 537: "This act takes effect January 1, 2010." [ 2009 c 537 s 9.]